Utah statutes.
34A-6-102.   Legislative intent.
The intent of this chapter is:
(1)  to preserve human resources by providing for the safety and health of
workers; and
(2)  to provide a coordinated state plan to implement, establish, and enforce
occupational safety and health standards as effective as the standards under
the Williams-Steiger Occupational Safety and Health Act of 1970, 29 U.S.C.
Sec. 651 et seq.
